Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1710
Crimes; prevention; arrest; powers and duties.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff by himself or deputy to preserve the peace in his county, to ferret out crime, to apprehend and arrest all criminals, and insofar as it is within his power, to secure evidence of all crimes committed in his county, and present the same to the county attorney and the grand jury; to file informations against all persons who he knows, or has reason to believe, have violated the laws of the state, and to perform all other duties pertaining to the office of sheriff.

Laws 1917, c. 231, § 1, p. 567;

C.S.1922, § 4989;

C.S.1929, § 26-1410;

R.S.1943, § 23-1710.

Where sheriff had reliable information about existence of incendiary device action in going upon property and inspecting for existence of fire without actual entry or search of building was proper. State v. Howard, 184 Neb. 274, 167 N.W.2d 80 (1969).

Sheriff has duty to apprehend and arrest all criminals and must, if necessary, follow them into any county to do so. State ex rel. Johnson v. Goble, 136 Neb. 242, 285 N.W. 569 (1939).

Sheriff is not disqualified because of interest when testimony as witness is merely corroborative. Noonan v. State, 117 Neb. 520, 221 N.W. 434 (1928).